District of Columbia statutes.
7-2207

Appropriations authorized.

Appropriations for carrying out the purposes of this chapter are hereby authorized.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 5

History

1981 Ed., § 6-1407.
1973 Ed., § 6-1205.

Prior Codifications